Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB734.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The America250PA Commission was established to plan, encourage, develop and coordinate the commemoration of the 250th anniversary of the founding of the United States, Pennsylvania's integral role in that event and the impact of its people on the nation's past, present and future.(2) The America250PA Semiquincentennial Celebration Bell monument was designed by the America250PA Commission.(3) The America250PA Commission has accepted responsibility to coordinate the preparation for and 12345678910111213141516171819 acquisition of supplies necessary to erect the monument and construction of the monument.Section 2. Location of monument.The area outside the East Wing of the Capitol Complex on the concourse level, between the fountain and the entrance to the East Wing on the grounds of the State Capitol, shall be the location for the Semiquincentennial Celebration Bell monument.Section 3. Department of General Services.(a) Preparation.--The Department of General Services shall prepare the designated location of the monument and, upon the disbanding of the America250PA Commission, the ownership of the monument shall transition to the Department of General Services and be considered the property of the Commonwealth. The Department of General Services shall be responsible for the appropriate maintenance of the monument in perpetuity.(b) Cooperation.--The Department of General Services shall cooperate with the America250PA Commission regarding the construction and placement of the Semiquincentennial Celebration Bell monument.(c) Construction.--Except as provided under this section, nothing in this act shall be construed to impose any duties upon the Department of General Services.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0734PN0799 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324